District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.06

Advance payments.

If the owner, for the purpose of avoiding the provisions hereof, and defeating the lien of the subcontractor or other person employed by the contractor, as aforesaid, shall make payments to the contractor in advance of the time agreed upon therefor in the contract, and the amount still due or to become due to the contractor shall be insufficient to satisfy the liens of the subcontractors or others so employed by the contractor, the property shall remain subject to said liens in the same manner as if such payments had not been made.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1385, ch. 854, § 1244
1981 Ed., § 38-108.
1973 Ed., § 38-108.